Illinois, session 104th, HB4351.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Theresa Tracy Trot-Illinois CancerCare 8Foundation Fund. 9    Section 10. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 10Section 3.699.29 as follows: 11    (625 ILCS 5/3.699.29 new)12    Sec. 3.699.29. Retro license plates. 13    (a) The Secretary, upon receipt of an application made in 14the form prescribed by the Secretary, may issue special 15registration plates designated as retro license plates. The 16special plates issued under this Section shall be affixed only 17to passenger vehicles of the first division, motorcycles, 18autocycles, and motor vehicles of the second division weighing 19not more than 8,000 pounds. Plates issued under this Section 20shall expire according to the multi-year procedure established 21by Section 3-414.1 of this Code.  HB4351- 2 -LRB104 17293 LNS 30715 b1    (b) The design and color of the plates shall be a replica 2of the license plates issued between 1983 and 2001 in the same 3style as when former Governor Jim Edgar served as Secretary of 4State. The Secretary may allow the plates to be issued as 5vanity plates or personalized under Section 3-405.1 of this 6Code. 7    (c) An applicant for the special plate shall be charged a 8$40 fee for original issuance, in addition to the appropriate 9registration fees, of which $38 shall be deposited into the 10Theresa Tracy Trot-Illinois Cancer Care Foundation Fund and $2 11shall be deposited into the Secretary of State Special License 12Plate Fund. For each registration renewal period, a $27 fee 13shall be charged, of which $25 shall be deposited into the 14Theresa Tracy Trot-Illinois CancerCare Foundation Fund and $2 15shall be deposited into the Secretary of State Special License 16Plate Fund.17    The Theresa Tracy Trot-Illinois CancerCare Foundation Fund 18is created as a special fund in the State treasury. All money 19in the Theresa Tracy Trot-Illinois CancerCare Foundation Fund 20shall be paid to the Illinois CancerCare Foundation for the 21purpose of furthering pancreatic cancer research as a tribute 22to Governor Jim Edgar and all Illinoisans who have battled 23pancreatic cancer. 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 251, 2027.